sv: Dämpningsnivå: Justerbar/variabel; Kraftig; Kraftig (övning); Lätt; Lätt (övertonskontroll); Medium; Övrigt
cs: Úroveň tlumení: Nastavitelné/variabilní; Silné; Silné (cvičné); Slabé; Slabé (kontrola alikvotních tónů); Střední; Jiné
vi: Mức độ giảm âm: Có thể điều chỉnh/biến thiên; Nặng; Nặng (luyện tập); Nhẹ; Nhẹ (kiểm soát âm bồi); Trung bình; Khác
ja: 減衰レベル: 調整可能/可変; ヘビー; ヘビー (練習用); ライト; ライト (倍音コントロール); ミディアム; その他
fr: Niveau d'amortissement: Réglable/variable; Élevé; Élevé (entraînement); Léger; Léger (contrôle des harmoniques); Moyen; Autre
el: Επίπεδο απόσβεσης: Ρυθμιζόμενο/μεταβλητό; Βαρύ; Βαρύ (για εξάσκηση); Ελαφρύ; Ελαφρύ (έλεγχος αρμονικών); Μεσαίο; Άλλο
pt-BR: Nível de amortecimento: Ajustável/variável; Pesado; Pesado (prática); Leve; Leve (controle de harmônicos); Médio; Outro
da: Dæmpningsniveau: Justerbar/variabel; Kraftig; Kraftig (øvelse); Let; Let (overtonekontrol); Medium; Andet
es: Nivel de amortiguación: Ajustable/variable; Fuerte; Fuerte (práctica); Suave; Suave (control de armónicos); Media; Otro
ro-RO: Nivel de amortizare: Reglabil/variabil; Puternică; Puternică (exercițiu); Ușoară; Ușoară (controlul armonicelor); Medie; Altele
pl: Poziom tłumienia: Regulowane/zmienne; Mocne; Mocne (do ćwiczeń); Lekkie; Lekkie (kontrola alikwotów); Średnie; Inne
nl: Dempingsniveau: Verstelbaar/variabel; Zwaar; Zwaar (oefenen); Licht; Licht (boventooncontrole); Medium; Overige
tr: Sönümleme seviyesi: Ayarlanabilir/değişken; Ağır; Ağır (pratik); Hafif; Hafif (armonik kontrolü); Orta; Diğer
it: Livello di smorzamento: Regolabile/variabile; Forte; Forte (pratica); Leggero; Leggero (controllo degli armonici); Medio; Altro
fi: Vaimennustaso: Säädettävä/muuttuva; Voimakas; Voimakas (harjoittelu); Kevyt; Kevyt (ylä-äänien hallinta); Keskitaso; Muu
pt-PT: Nível de amortecimento: Ajustável/variável; Pesado; Pesado (prática); Leve; Leve (controlo de sobretons); Médio; Outro
en: Damping level: Adjustable/variable; Heavy; Heavy (practice); Light; Light (overtone control); Medium; Other
ko: 댐핑 수준: 조절 가능/가변형; 강함; 강함(연습용); 약함; 약함(배음 조절); 중간; 기타
ru: Уровень демпфирования: Регулируемое/переменное; Сильное; Сильное (для практики); Слабое; Слабое (контроль обертонов); Среднее; Другое
sk-SK: Úroveň tlmenia: Nastaviteľné/variabilné; Silné; Silné (cvičenie); Ľahké; Ľahké (kontrola alikvótov); Stredné; Iné
bg-BG: Ниво на затихване: Регулируемо/променливо; Силно; Силно (за упражнения); Леко; Леко (контрол на обертоновете); Средно; Други
sl-SI: Raven dušenja: Prilagodljivo/spremenljivo; Močno; Močno (za vajo); Rahlo; Rahlo (nadzor alikvotnih tonov); Srednje; Drugo
nb: Dempingsnivå: Justerbar/variabel; Tung; Tung (øving); Lett; Lett (overtonekontroll); Middels; Annet
hr-HR: Razina prigušenja: Podesivo/varijabilno; Jako; Jako (vježbanje); Lagano; Lagano (kontrola prizvuka); Srednje; Ostalo
lt-LT: Slopinimo lygis: Reguliuojamas / kintamas; Stiprus; Stiprus (repeticijoms); Silpnas; Silpnas (obertonų valdymas); Vidutinis; Kita
th: ระดับการหน่วง: ปรับได้/แปรผัน; หนัก; หนัก (สำหรับฝึกซ้อม); เบา; เบา (ควบคุมเสียงโอเวอร์โทน); ปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
de: Dämpfungsgrad: Einstellbar/variabel; Schwer; Schwer (Übung); Leicht; Leicht (Obertonkontrolle); Mittel; Sonstige
zh-TW: 弱音程度: 可調式/可變式; 重; 重 (練習用); 輕; 輕 (泛音控制); 中; 其他
hu: Csillapítási szint: Állítható/változtatható; Erős; Erős (gyakorló); Gyenge; Enyhe (felhangszabályozás); Közepes; Egyéb
zh-CN: 阻尼水平: 可调/可变; 重; 重（练习）; 轻; 轻（泛音控制）; 中; 其他